Hawaii, session 2026, SB3295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $350,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the fourth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Equitable and Sustainable Water Access Project A.   New water distribution system connection to the department of agriculture and biosecurity's Puu Pulehu and Waimea reservoirs. Plans and design         $350,000 Total funding                      $350,000 SECTION 2. The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3. The sum appropriated for the capital improvement project set forth in section 1 shall be expended by the department of Hawaiian home lands for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________